Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 18 Residential Landlord and Tenant Act

34-18-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Residential Landlord and Tenant Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-2.
Purposes — Rules of construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

Underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are to:

Simplify, clarify, modernize and revise the law governing the rental of dwelling units and the rights and obligations of landlords and tenants;

Encourage landlords and tenants to maintain and improve the quality and availability of housing;

Make more uniform the law relating to residential landlord and tenant relations in those respects in which this chapter follows the “Uniform Residential Landlord — Tenant Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-3.
Supplementary principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the law relating to capacity to contract, mutuality of obligations, principal and agent, real property, public health, safety, and fire prevention, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause supplements its provisions.

This chapter shall apply to any rental agreement involving public housing or any type of federally subsidized or regulated housing except where:

A particular subject matter has been pre-empted by federal law, or;

A landlord or tenant has any rights or responsibilities derived from federal law or regulations which directly conflict with the provisions of this chapter, in which case the rights and responsibilities derived from federal laws and regulations shall control.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-4.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This chapter being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it is to be construed as impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and the provisions of chapters 18.1, 19, or 20 of this title, the provisions of this chapter shall control.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-5.
Administration of remedies — Enforcement.

The remedies provided by this chapter shall be so administered that an aggrieved party may recover appropriate damages and injunctive relief, including temporary restraining orders, as set forth in §

34-18-6

. The aggrieved party has a duty to mitigate damages.

Any right or obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and limited effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-6.
Temporary restraining orders — Ex parte proceedings.

No temporary restraining order shall be granted without notice to the adverse party unless it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or by the verified complaint that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the applicant before notice can be served and a hearing had thereon. Every temporary restraining order granted without notice shall be endorsed with the date and hour of issuance; shall be filed forthwith in the clerk’s office and entered of record; and shall expire by its terms within such time after entry, not to exceed ten (10) days, as the court fixes, unless within the time so fixed, the order by consent or for good cause shown and after hearing of argument by the parties or counsel, is extended for an additional period. In case a temporary order is granted without notice, the motion for a preliminary injunction shall be set down for hearing at the earliest possible time and shall be given precedence over all matters except older matters of the same character; and when the motion comes on for hearing, the party who obtained the temporary restraining order shall proceed with the application for a preliminary injunction, and, if he or she does not do so, the court shall dissolve the temporary restraining order.

On two (2) days’ notice to the party who obtained the temporary restraining order without notice, or on such shorter notice to that party as the court may prescribe, the adverse party may appear and move its dissolution or modification, and in that event the court shall proceed to hear and determine such motion as expeditiously as the ends of justice require.

Every order granting an injunction and every restraining order shall be specific in terms; shall describe in reasonable detail the act or acts sought to be restrained; and is binding only upon the parties to the action, their officers, agents, managers, employees, and attorneys, and upon those persons in active concert or participation with them who receive actual notice of the order by personal service or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-7.
Application.

This chapter applies to, regulates and determines rights, obligations, and remedies under a rental agreement, wherever made, for a dwelling unit located within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-8.
Exclusions from application of chapter.

Unless the parties expressly agree to be governed by the provisions of this chapter, the following arrangements are not governed by this chapter:

Residence at an institution, public or private, if incidental to detention or the provision of medical, geriatric, educational, counseling, religious, or similar service;

Occupancy under a contract of sale of a dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, if the occupant is the purchaser or a person who succeeds to his or her interest;

Occupancy by a member of a fraternal or social organization in the portion of a structure operated for the benefit of the organization;

Transient occupancy in a hotel, motel, or other lodging as defined under §

44-18-7(11)

, which is subject to the state sales and use tax, or lodgings tax as allowed by state enabling legislation;

Occupancy by a paid employee of a landlord, whose right to occupancy is conditional upon employment substantially for services, maintenance, or repair of premises containing more than eleven (11) units;

Occupancy by a holder of a proprietary lease in a cooperative;

Commercial letting and any other estate governed by chapter 18.1 of this title;

Residence at a transitional housing facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 301, § 1.

34-18-9.
Jurisdiction.

The district or appropriate housing court of this state shall exercise jurisdiction in both law and equity over any landlord or tenant with respect to any conduct in this state governed by this chapter or with respect to any claim arising from a transaction subject to this chapter. In addition to any other method provided by rule or by statute, personal jurisdiction over a landlord or tenant may be acquired in a civil action or proceeding commenced in the court by the service of process in the manner provided by §

34-18-10(c)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-10.
Service of process for actions pursuant to chapter.

In actions for nonpayment of rent, the summons for eviction for nonpayment of rent shall be in the form provided in §

34-18-56(g)

. At the time of filing of the complaint, the clerk shall enter the date of hearing upon the summons, which shall be fourteen (14) to twenty-four (24) days after filing of the complaint. For the purposes of this section only, the time of filing of the complaint shall be the date upon which the clerk assigns a case number to the action and the filing fee is paid to the clerk. On the same day that the complaint is filed, the plaintiff’s attorney or, if pro se, the plaintiff, or if more than one, the person filing the complaint shall mail a copy of the summons and complaint with the date of the hearing and a blank answer form as provided in § 34-18-56(j) by first class mail, to the defendant, shall complete the proof of service on a copy of the original summons and file the completed proof of service in the appropriate court. The plaintiff shall deliver the original summons and a copy thereof, together with a copy of the complaint and a blank answer form to the division of sheriffs or any constable of the county in which the appropriate court is located. The officer receiving the copies shall serve them by:

Handing them to the defendant; or

Serving them at the defendant’s dwelling unit to a person of suitable age and discretion then residing therein; or

If none be found, by posting them conspicuously on the door to defendant’s dwelling unit.

The deputy sheriff or constable serving the summons and complaint shall make proof of service on the original summons and shall file it with the clerk of the appropriate court at or before the time of the hearing. The proof of service shall show the manner and the day, hour, and place of service, and shall show that the defendant was served no less than five (5) days before the hearing.

In all actions pursuant to this chapter other than for nonpayment of rent, the procedure shall be as follows:

The summons for eviction actions pursuant to §§

34-18-36

and

34-18-38

shall be in the form provided in §

34-18-56(h)

. A blank answer, in the form provided in § 34-18-56(j) shall be served together with this summons.

The summons in all other actions pursuant to this chapter shall be in the form provided in § 34-18-56(i). Service shall be made pursuant to Rule 4 of the district court civil rules, or other appropriate rule of court.

If a landlord or tenant is not a resident of this state or is a corporation not authorized to do business in this state and engages in any conduct in this state governed by this chapter, or engages in a transaction subject to this chapter, he or she may designate an agent upon whom service of process may be made in this state. The agent shall be a resident of this state or a corporation authorized to do business in this state. The designation shall be in writing and filed with the secretary of state. If no designation is made and filed or if the process cannot be served in this state upon the designated agent, process may be served upon the secretary of state, but service upon the secretary of state is not effective unless the plaintiff or petitioner forthwith mails a copy of the process and pleading by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at his or her last reasonably ascertainable address. An affidavit of compliance with this subsection shall be filed with the clerk of the court on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within any further time the court allows.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 206, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 207, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 65; P.L. 2022, ch. 206, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 207, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

34-18-11.
Definitions.

Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent sections of this chapter which apply to specific sections thereof, and unless the context otherwise requires, in this chapter:

“Abandonment” means the tenant has vacated the premises without notice to the landlord and has no intention of returning, as evidenced by nonpayment of rent for more than fifteen (15) days and removal of substantially all possessions from the premises;

“Action” includes recoupment, counterclaim, set-off, suit in equity, and any other proceeding in which rights are determined, including an action for possession;

“Building and housing codes” include any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation concerning fitness for habitation, or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or appearance of any premises of dwelling unit;

“Dwelling unit” means a structure or part of a structure that is designed or intended to be used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one or more persons;

“Fair rental value” means rent which is of comparable value with that of other rental properties of similar size and condition within the contiguous neighborhood;

“Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction concerned;

“Landlord” means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit or the building of which it is a part, and it also means a manager of the premises who fails to disclose as required by §

34-18-20

;

“Ordinary wear and tear” means deterioration of the premises which is the result of the tenant’s normal nonabusive living and includes, but is not limited to, deterioration caused by the landlord’s failure to prepare for expected conditions or by the landlord’s failure to comply with his or her obligations;

“Organization” includes a corporation, government, governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership of association, two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest, and any other legal or commercial entity;

“Owner” shall mean any person who, alone or jointly or severally with others:

Has legal title or tax title (pursuant to §§

44-9-40

—

44-9-46

, inclusive, of the general laws) to any dwelling, dwelling unit or structure with or without accompanying actual possession thereof; or

Has charge, care, or control of any dwelling, dwelling unit or structure as owner or agent of the owner, or an executor, administrator, trustee, or guardian of the estate of the owner. Any person representing the actual owner in this way shall be bound to comply with the provisions of this chapter and of rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto to the same extent as if he or she were the owner.

“Person” includes an individual or organization;

“Premises” means a dwelling unit and the structure of which it is a part and facilities and appurtenances therein and grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally, or the use of which is promised to the tenant;

“Rent” means the payment or consideration that a tenant pays to a landlord for the use of the premises, whether money, services, property, or produce of the land;

“Rental agreement” means all agreements, written or oral, and valid rules and regulations adopted under §

34-18-25

embodying the terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises, and also includes any terms required by law;

“Roomer” means a tenant occupying a dwelling unit which consists of any room or group of rooms forming a single habitable unit used or intended to be used for living and sleeping, but not for cooking or eating purposes;

“Security deposit” means a sum of money given by a tenant to a landlord at the outset of the tenancy or shortly thereafter, as a deposit against physical damages to the tenant’s dwelling unit during said tenancy;

“Tenant” means a person entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others;

“Transitional housing facility” means a facility which, for a period not to exceed two (2) years, provides its residents with appropriate social services for the purpose of fostering independence, self sufficiency, and eventual transition to a permanent living arrangement;

“Willful” means that the act was performed intentionally, knowingly and purposely, not accidentally or inadvertently and without justifiable excuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 87, § 1.

34-18-12.
Obligation of good faith.

Every duty under this chapter and every act which must be performed as a condition precedent to the exercise of a right or remedy under this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-13.
Unconscionability.

If the court, as a matter of law, finds:

A rental agreement or any provision thereof was unconscionable when made, the court may refuse to enforce the agreement, enforce the remainder of the agreement without the unconscionable provision, or limit the application of any unconscionable provision to avoid an unconscionable result; or

A settlement in which a party waives or agrees to forego a claim or right under this chapter or under a rental agreement was unconscionable when made, the court may refuse to enforce the settlement, enforce the remainder of the settlement without the unconscionable provisions, or limit the application of any unconscionable provision to avoid an unconscionable result.

If unconscionability is put into issue by a party or by the court upon its own motion, the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to the setting, purpose and effect of the rental agreement or settlement to aid the court in making the determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-14.
Notice.

A person has notice of a fact if:

He or she has actual knowledge of it;

He or she has received a notice or notification of it; or

From all the facts and circumstances known to him or her at the time in question he or she has reason to know that it exists.

A person “knows” or “has knowledge” of a fact if he or she has actual knowledge of it.

A person “notifies” or “gives” a notice or notification to another person by taking steps reasonably calculated to inform the other in ordinary course whether or not the other actually comes to know of it. A person “receives” a notice or notification when:

It comes to his or her attention; or

It is delivered in hand or sent by first class mail to him or her at a place held out by him or her as the place for receipt of the communication, or in the absence of such designation, to his or her last known place of residence.

“Notice,” knowledge or a notice or notification received by an organization, is effective for a particular transaction from the time it is brought to the attention of the individual conducting that transaction, and in any event from the time it would have been brought to his or her attention if the organization had exercised reasonable diligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-15.
Terms and conditions of rental agreement.

A landlord and a tenant may include in a rental agreement terms and conditions not prohibited by this chapter or other rule of law, including rent, term of the agreement, and other provisions governing the rights and obligations of the parties.

In absence of agreement, the tenant shall pay as rent the fair rental value for the use and occupancy of the dwelling unit.

Rent is payable without demand or notice at the time and place agreed upon by the parties. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is payable at the dwelling unit and periodic rent is payable at the beginning of any term of one month or less and otherwise in equal monthly installments at the beginning of each month. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is uniformly apportionable from day-to-day.

Unless the rental agreement fixes a definite term, the tenancy is week-to-week in case of a roomer who pays weekly rent, and in all other cases month to month.

A tenant who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older or who will turn sixty-five (65) during the term of a rental agreement for a dwelling unit may terminate such a rental agreement in order to enter a residential care and assisted living facility, as defined in §

23-17.4-2

, a nursing facility, or a unit in a private or public housing complex designated by the federal government as housing for the elderly. The tenant may terminate the rental agreement by notice given in writing to the usual person to whom rental payments are made. The notice shall be accompanied by documentation of admission or pending admission to a facility or housing complex described in this section. Termination of the rental agreement shall be effective no earlier than forty-five (45) days after the first rental payment due date following delivery of written notice of termination.

A lease of premises occupied, or intended to be occupied, by a servicemember or a servicemember’s dependents may be unilaterally terminated if:

The lease is executed by or on behalf of a person who, thereafter, and during the term of the lease, enters military service; or

The servicemember, while in military service, executes the lease and thereafter receives military orders for a change of permanent station or to deploy with a military unit, or as an individual in support of a military operation, for a period of not less than ninety (90) days; and

The lessee delivers to the lessor (or the lessor’s grantee), or to the lessor’s agent (or the agent’s grantee), written notice of the termination, and a copy of the servicemember’s military orders.

Effective date of lease termination. In the event that a lease provides for monthly payment of rent, termination of the lease under this section is effective thirty (30) days after the first date on which the next rental payment is due and payable after the date on which the notice is delivered.

In the case of any other lease, termination of the lease is effective on the last day of the month following the month in which the notice is delivered.

The lessee shall be responsible for rent amounts of the lease that are unpaid for the period preceding the effective date of the lease termination on a prorated basis. The lessor may not impose an early termination charge, but any taxes, summonses, or other obligations and liabilities of the lessee in accordance with the terms of the lease, including reasonable charges to the lessee for excess wear, that are due and unpaid at the time of termination of the lease, shall be paid by the lessee.

Rent paid in advance. Rents or lease amounts paid in advance for a period after the effective date of the termination of the lease shall be refunded to the lessee by the lessor (or the lessor’s assignee or the assignee’s agent) within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the termination of the lease.

A lessee’s termination of a lease pursuant to this section shall terminate any obligation a dependent of the lessee may have under the lease.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 237, § 2.

Particular Cases.

Where a residential tenant had a month-to-month lease, as her landlord prevented her from accessing the premises after October 6, in violation of

R.I. Gen. Laws

§§

34-18-21

and

34-18-44

, she was not obliged to pay rent thereafter and was entitled to the return of her security deposit minus the unpaid, accrued rent for the period from October 1 through October 6. Furlan v. Farrar, 982 A.2d 581,

2009 R.I. LEXIS 120

(R.I. 2009).

Where landlord lost rents because renters decided not to rent houses on which unruly gathering notices had been posted pursuant to a nuisance ordinance, the landlords’ interests in the lost rents were not protected under the Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment because

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

34-18-15(a)

did not create a legitimate claim of entitlement to a desired rental value for an apartment or transform rental income into a government benefice. URI Student Senate v. Town of Narragansett, 707 F. Supp. 2d 282, 2010 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6261 (D.R.I. 2010), aff'd, 631 F.3d 1, 2011 U.S. App. LEXIS 141 (1st Cir. 2011).

34-18-16.
Effect of unsigned or undelivered rental agreement.

If the landlord does not sign and deliver a written rental agreement signed and delivered to him or her by the tenant, acceptance of rent without reservation by the landlord gives the rental agreement the same effect as if it had been signed and delivered by the landlord.

If the tenant does not sign and deliver a written rental agreement signed and delivered to him or her by the landlord, acceptance of possession and payment of rent without reservation gives the rental agreement the same effect as if it had been signed and delivered by the tenant.

If a rental agreement given effect by the operation of this section provides for a term longer than one year, it is effective for only one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-16.1.
Rent increases — Notice requirements.

Prior to an increase in rent being imposed by a landlord for a residential tenancy, notice of the increase shall be given in writing to any tenant by a landlord at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the increase.

A landlord must give sixty (60) days notice to month to month tenants over the age of sixty-two (62), before raising the rent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 397, § 1.

34-18-17.
Prohibited provisions in rental agreements.

A rental agreement may not provide that the tenant:

Agrees to waive or forego rights or remedies under this chapter;

Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the rental agreement;

Agrees to pay the landlord’s attorney’s fees inconsistent with this chapter; or

Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the landlord arising under law or to indemnify the landlord for that liability or the costs connected with the liability.

A provision prohibited by subsection (a) included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord deliberately uses a rental agreement containing provisions known to be prohibited, the tenant may recover, in addition to his or her actual damages, an amount up to three (3) months periodic rent and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-18.
Receipt of rent free of maintenance obligations forbidden.

A rental agreement, assignment, conveyance, trust deed, or security instrument may not permit the receipt of rent free of the obligation to comply with §

34-18-22(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-19.
Security deposits.

A landlord may not demand or receive a security deposit, however denominated, in an amount or value in excess of one month’s periodic rent.

Upon termination of the tenancy, the amount of security deposit due to the tenant shall be the entire amount given by the tenant as a security deposit, minus any amount of unpaid accrued rent, the amount due, if any, for reasonable cleaning expenses, the amount due, if any, for reasonable trash disposal expenses and the amount of physical damages to the premises, other than ordinary wear and tear, that the landlord has suffered by reason of the tenant’s noncompliance with §

34-18-24

, all as itemized by the landlord in a written notice delivered to the tenant. The landlord shall deliver the notice, together with the amount of the security deposit due to the tenant, within twenty (20) days after the later of either termination of the tenancy, delivery of possession, or the tenant’s providing the landlord with a forwarding address for the purpose of receiving the security deposit.

If the landlord fails to comply with subsection (b), the tenant may recover the amount due him or her, together with damages in an amount equal to twice the amount wrongfully withheld, and reasonable attorney fees.

This section does not preclude the landlord or tenant from recovering other damages to which he or she may be entitled under this chapter.

This section does not preclude any landlord who rents a furnished apartment from demanding or receiving a furniture security deposit if the replacement value of the furniture being furnished by the landlord valued at the time the lease is executed is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, in which instance the landlord may charge a separate furniture security deposit of up to one month’s periodic rent.

Upon termination of the tenancy, the amount of furniture security deposit due to the tenant shall be the entire amount given by the tenant as a furniture security deposit, minus the amount due, if any, for reasonable cleaning expenses and repair and the amount of physical damages to the furniture, other than ordinary wear and tear. The landlord shall deliver the notice, together with the amount of the furniture security deposit due to the tenant, within twenty (20) days after the later of either termination of the tenancy, delivery of possession, or the tenant’s providing the landlord with a forwarding address for the purpose of receiving the furniture security deposit.

In the event the landlord transfers his or her interest in the premises, the holder of the landlord’s interest in the premises at the time of the termination of the tenancy is bound by this section.

No rental agreement shall contain any waiver of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 260, § 1.

34-18-20.
Disclosure.

A landlord or any person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf shall disclose to the tenant in writing, at or before the commencement of the tenancy, the name, address and number of:

The person authorized to manage the premises; and

An owner of the premises or a person authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner for the purpose of service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands.

The information required to be furnished by this section shall be kept current. This section extends to and is enforceable against any successor landlord, owner, or manager.

A person who fails to comply with subsection (a) of this section becomes an agent of each person who is a landlord for:

Service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands; and

Performing the obligations of the landlord under this chapter and under the rental agreement and expending or making available for the purpose of all rent collected from the premises.

A landlord who becomes delinquent on a mortgage securing real estate upon which the dwelling unit is located for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days shall notify the tenant that the property may be subject to foreclosure; and until the foreclosure occurs the tenant must continue to pay rent to the landlord as provided under the rental agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 513, § 1.

34-18-21.
Landlord to deliver possession of dwelling unit.

At the commencement of the term a landlord shall deliver possession of the premises to the tenant in compliance with the rental agreement and §

34-18-22

. The landlord may bring an action for possession against any person wrongfully in possession and may recover the damages provided in §

34-18-38(c)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

Particular Cases.

Where a residential tenant had a month-to-month lease, as her landlord prevented her from accessing the premises after October 6, in violation of

R.I. Gen. Laws

§§

34-18-21

and

34-18-44

, she was not obliged to pay rent thereafter and was entitled to the return of her security deposit minus the unpaid, accrued rent for the period from October 1 through October 6. Furlan v. Farrar, 982 A.2d 581,

2009 R.I. LEXIS 120

(R.I. 2009).

34-18-22.
Landlord to maintain premises.

A landlord shall:

Comply with the requirements of applicable building and housing codes affecting health and safety;

Make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the premises in a fit and habitable condition;

Keep all common areas of the premises in a clean and safe condition;

Maintain in good and safe working order and condition all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord;

Provide and maintain appropriate receptacles and conveniences for the removal of ashes, garbage, rubbish, and other waste incidental to the occupancy of the dwelling unit as required by §

45-24.3-6

, or applicable local codes if more restrictive, and arrange for their removal;

Supply running water and reasonable amounts of hot water at all times as required by §

45-24.3-7

, or applicable local codes if more restrictive, and reasonable heat as required by §

45-24.3-9

, or applicable local codes if more restrictive, between October 1 and May 1, except where the building that includes the dwelling unit is not required by law to be equipped for that purpose, or the dwelling unit is so constructed that heat or hot water is generated by an installation within the exclusive control of the tenant and supplied by a direct public utility connection; and

Obtain and have in full force and effect a general liability insurance policy of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for those persons injured on the premises due to the negligence of the landlord. The landlord shall provide a copy of the declaration page from the carrier showing the policy to the tenant with the written lease at the beginning of the tenancy and shall provide a new copy with each policy renewal to the tenant.

If the duty imposed by subsection (a)(1) is greater than any duty imposed by any other paragraph of subsection (a) of this section, the landlord’s duty shall be determined by reference to subsection (a)(1).

The landlord and tenant of a dwelling unit may agree in writing that the tenant perform specified repairs, maintenance tasks, alterations, and remodeling but only if:

The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith and set forth in a writing signed by the parties and supported by adequate consideration;

The work is not necessary to cure noncompliance with subsection (a)(1); and

The agreement does not diminish or affect the obligation of the landlord to other tenants in the premises.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 210, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 323, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

34-18-22.1.
Landlord’s duty to notify tenant of violation.

A landlord, when cited by a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency for a housing code violation, shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice, deliver a copy of the notice of violation to each residential tenant of the building affected by said violation, unless within said thirty (30) day period the landlord has corrected all violations set forth in the notice of violation to the satisfaction of the state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency which issued the notice of violation.

A landlord, prior to entering into any residential rental agreement, shall inform a prospective tenant of any outstanding minimum housing code violations which exist on the building that is the subject of the rental agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 596, § 1.

34-18-22.2.
Landlord’s duty regarding compliance with zoning and minimum housing laws.

Whenever any landlord, either by his or her own labor or through the use of others acting on his or her behalf, undertakes physical alterations to an existing building which alterations create a residential apartment or apartments, and the landlord knew or should have known that the alterations would result in the construction of an apartment or apartments which violate the applicable state and/or local zoning laws and/or state or local minimum housing codes, the landlord shall be responsible to pay the moving costs of any tenants required to move from any of the apartments because of the nonconformity of the apartments with the law; provided, however, that the landlord will be required to pay such moving costs only to a place within the same city or town where the property in violation of the law is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 410, § 1.

34-18-22.3.
Nonresident landlord to designate agent for service of process.

A landlord who is not a resident of this state shall designate and continuously maintain an agent upon whom service may be made of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served, including, but not limited to, notices of minimum housing code violations. The agent shall be a resident of this state or a corporation authorized to do business in this state. The landlord’s designation shall be in writing, shall include the name and address of the agent, shall include the street address of each property designated to the agent, and shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the clerk of the city or town wherein the dwelling unit is located. Any landlord who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be subject to a civil fine of one hundred dollars ($100) per month up to a maximum of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) in a calendar year or if the monthly rent exceeds one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200), the civil fine shall be one month’s rent for the calendar year, payable to the municipality.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 265, § 1.

34-18-23.
Limitation of liability upon sale or change of management.

A landlord who conveys premises that include a dwelling unit subject to a rental agreement in a good faith sale to a bona fide purchaser is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and this chapter as to events occurring after written notice to the tenant of the conveyance. In no event may the relief from liability predate the conveyance itself.

Written notice, for purposes of this section, must include the name(s), address, and telephone number of the person or persons purchasing the property and assuming liability. To be effective, the written notice must also certify compliance with §

45-24.3-17

that prohibits sale or lease of property until any outstanding housing code violations have been corrected or the seller or lessor has provided to the buyer or lessee, as well as to the enforcing officer, all notices regarding violations as required by the statute.

A manager of premises that include a dwelling unit is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and this chapter as to events occurring after written notice to the tenant of the termination of his or her management. The written notice must include the name(s), address, and telephone number of the person or persons assuming management and/or the person or persons within the state exercising ownership or responsibility over the property.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the tenant’s rights and duties under an existing rental agreement, and the purchaser of property or any immediate successor in interest to a mortgagor, other than a third-party, bona fide purchaser, of a premises containing four (4) or fewer dwelling units takes title subject to the same rights and responsibilities toward the tenant that the seller or mortgagor had.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 513, § 1.